Utah statutes.
48-2c-1610 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Merger of foreign company authorized to transact business in this state.

Whenever a foreign company authorized to transact business in this state shall be a party to a merger permitted by the laws of the state or jurisdiction under the laws of which it is organized, and such company shall be the surviving company, it shall, within 30 days after the merger becomes effective, file with the division a copy of the articles of merger duly authenticated by the proper officer of the state or country under the laws of which the merger was effected; and it shall not be necessary for the foreign company to procure either new or amended authority to transact business in this state unless the name of the company be changed thereby or unless the foreign company desires to pursue in this state other or additional purposes than those which it is then authorized to pursue in this state.

